Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-309
Failure of term; persons recognized; sureties; liability.

In case of such continuances or adjournments, persons recognized or bound to appear at the regular term, which has failed as aforesaid, shall be held bound in like manner, to appear at the time so fixed, and their sureties, if any, shall be liable, in case of their nonappearance, in the same manner as though the term had been held at the regular time, and they had failed to make their appearance thereat.

Laws 1879, § 33, p. 89;

R.S.1913, § 1168;

C.S.1922, § 1091;

C.S.1929, § 27-309;

R.S.1943, § 24-309.

Surety is not discharged by failure to hold term at which principal was recognized to appear. Bartling v. State, 67 Neb. 637, 93 N.W. 1047 (1903), affirming 67 Neb. 643, 97 N.W. 443 (1903).